Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RED LAKE NATION; NURSING HOME.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 is appropriated in fiscal year 2027 from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to the Red Lake Band of Chippewa for capital improvements to the nursing home location in the Red Lake Nation. This appropriation is onetime and is available until spent, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end